Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1301
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to adopt a central filing system for security interests relating to farm products pursuant to section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198. It is also the intent of the Legislature that upon the adoption of the central filing system that security interest holders be encouraged to use such system in lieu of any other notice provided by section 1324 for farm products produced or located in the State of Nebraska which are included in the central filing system.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 58.

Sections 52-1301 through 52-1321 were not intended to remove regular U.C.C. provisions regarding the creation, perfection, or priority of security interests. Battle Creek State Bank v. Preusker, 253 Neb. 502, 571 N.W.2d 294 (1997).